Washington statutes.
RCW 8.04.120

Judgment—Decree of appropriation—Recording.

At the time of rendering judgment for damages, whether upon default or trial, the court or judge thereof shall also enter a judgment or decree of appropriation of the land, real estate or premises sought to be appropriated, thereby vesting the legal title to the same in the state of Washington. Whenever said judgment or decree of appropriation is made, a certified copy of such judgment or decree of appropriation may be filed for record in the office of the auditor of the county where the said land, real estate or other premises are situated, and shall be recorded by said auditor like a deed of real estate, and with like effect.

[ 1891 c 74 s 6; RRS s 896.]

NOTES:

Recording of deeds of real estate: Title 65 RCW.